District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0283.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Georgia Avenue Acquisition Authority Emergency Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Acquisition authority.
The Mayor is authorized to acquire by purchase Lots 809, 840, 841, 842, 843, and 848 in
Square 2937.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact of the Chief Financial Officer as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and shall remain in effect for no longer than
90 days, as provided for emergency acts of the Council of the District of Columbia in section
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
412(a) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 788;
D.C. Official Code § 1-204.12(a)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2